test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-n_1_maa_oahpa-gt-norm-dial_Por.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - maa - ok : # Noun 'land' - ok
     maa+N+Sg+Nom: maa
     maa+N+Sg+Gen: maan
     maa+N+Sg+Par: maata
     maa+N+Sg+Tra: maaksi
     maa+N+Sg+Abe: maatta
     maa+N+Sg+Ine: maassa
     maa+N+Sg+Ela: maasta
     maa+N+Sg+Ill: maahan
     maa+N+Sg+Ade: maala
     maa+N+Sg+Abl: maalta
     maa+N+Sg+All: maale
     maa+N+Sg+Ess: maana
     maa+N+Pl+Nom: maat
     maa+N+Pl+Gen: [maitten, mainen] #mainen vain Por. varieteetissä
     maa+N+Pl+Par: maita
     maa+N+Pl+Tra: maiksi
     maa+N+Pl+Abe: maitta
     maa+N+Pl+Ine: maissa
     maa+N+Pl+Ela: maista
     maa+N+Pl+Ill: maihin
     maa+N+Pl+Ade: maila
     maa+N+Pl+Abl: mailta
     maa+N+Pl+All: maile
     maa+N+Pl+Ess: maina
     maa+N+Pl+Com: maine
